Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
202

HAWAII
WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL

Section

202-1 Council; appointment; tenure

202-2 Duties of council

202-3 Powers of council

202-4 Duties of chairperson and executive
director

202-5 Organizational relationships

202-6 to 9 Repealed

202-10 Report on workforce development programs

Manpower Development and Training

202-21 Participation in federal program

Note

Chapter heading
amended by L 1985, c 252, §1; L 1999, c 72, §2.

Skilled worker and
business development center at each community college. L Sp 2009, c 34.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next